data/grammar/fst/suffixes-generated.lexc
LEXICON VvSuffixesGenerated
++allak+1vv:allak # ;
++allak+1vv:allak VerbContinuations ;
++allak+1vv:ala # ;
++allak+1vv:ala VerbContinuations ;
++allak+1vv:SUPPRallak # ;
++allak+1vv:SUPPRallak VerbContinuations ;
++allak+1vv:SUPPRala # ;
++allak+1vv:SUPPRala VerbContinuations ;
++anik+1vv:anik # ;
++anik+1vv:anik VerbContinuations ;
++anik+1vv:SUPPRanik # ;
++anik+1vv:SUPPRanik VerbContinuations ;
++arjuk+2vv:arjuk # ;
++arjuk+2vv:arjuk VerbContinuations ;
++arjuk+2vv:SUPPRarjuk # ;
++arjuk+2vv:SUPPRarjuk VerbContinuations ;
++gai+1vv:gai # ;
++gai+1vv:gai VerbContinuations ;
++gai+1vv:gaik # ;
++gai+1vv:gaik VerbContinuations ;
++gai+1vv:SUPPRgai # ;
++gai+1vv:SUPPRgai VerbContinuations ;
++gai+1vv:SUPPRgaik # ;
++gai+1vv:SUPPRgaik VerbContinuations ;
++gai+1vv:kaik # ;
++gai+1vv:kaik VerbContinuations ;
++gai+1vv:SUPPRrai # ;
++gai+1vv:SUPPRrai VerbContinuations ;
++gai+1vv:SUPPRraik # ;
++gai+1vv:SUPPRraik VerbContinuations ;
++gajuk+1vv:gajuk # ;
++gajuk+1vv:gajuk VerbContinuations ;
++gajuk+1vv:SUPPRgajuk # ;
++gajuk+1vv:SUPPRgajuk VerbContinuations ;
++gajuk+1vv:SUPPRrajuk # ;
++gajuk+1vv:SUPPRrajuk VerbContinuations ;
++galuaq+1vv:galuaq # ;
++galuaq+1vv:galuaq VerbContinuations ;
++galuaq+1vv:kaluaq # ;
++galuaq+1vv:kaluaq VerbContinuations ;
++galuaq+1vv:SUPPRkaluaq # ;
++galuaq+1vv:SUPPRkaluaq VerbContinuations ;
++galuaq+1vv:SUPPRraluaq # ;
++galuaq+1vv:SUPPRraluaq VerbContinuations ;
++gaq+2vv:gaq # ;
++gaq+2vv:gaq VerbContinuations ;
++gaq+2vv:gaq AfterApIRoot ;
++gaq+2vv:gaq AfterApSiRoot ;
++gaq+2vv:SUPPRgaq # ;
++gaq+2vv:SUPPRgaq VerbContinuations ;
++gaq+2vv:SUPPRgaq AfterApIRoot ;
++gaq+2vv:SUPPRgaq AfterApSiRoot ;
++giaq+1vv:giaq # ;
++giaq+1vv:giaq VerbContinuations ;
++giaq+1vv:giaq AfterApRiRoot ;
++giaq+1vv:SUPPRgiaq # ;
++giaq+1vv:SUPPRgiaq VerbContinuations ;
++giaq+1vv:SUPPRgiaq AfterApRiRoot ;
++giaq+1vv:SUPPRriaq # ;
++giaq+1vv:SUPPRriaq VerbContinuations ;
++giaq+1vv:SUPPRriaq AfterApRiRoot ;
++innaq+2vv:innaq # ;
++innaq+2vv:innaq VerbContinuations ;
++innaq+2vv:SUPPRinnaq # ;
++innaq+2vv:SUPPRinnaq VerbContinuations ;
++innaujaq+1vv:innaujaq # ;
++innaujaq+1vv:innaujaq VerbContinuations ;
++innaujaq+1vv:SUPPRinnaujaq # ;
++innaujaq+1vv:SUPPRinnaujaq VerbContinuations ;
++iq+2vv:iq # ;
++iq+2vv:iq VerbContinuations ;
++iq+2vv:SUPPRiq # ;
++iq+2vv:SUPPRiq VerbContinuations ;
++jaq+2vv:jaq # ;
++jaq+2vv:jaq VerbContinuations ;
++jaq+2vv:SUPPRjaq # ;
++jaq+2vv:SUPPRjaq VerbContinuations ;
++jaqtuq+1vv:jaqtuq # ;
++jaqtuq+1vv:jaqtuq VerbContinuations ;
++jaqtuq+1vv:jaqtuq AfterApIRoot ;
++jaqtuq+1vv:jaaqtuq # ;
++jaqtuq+1vv:jaaqtuq VerbContinuations ;
++jaqtuq+1vv:jaaqtuq AfterApIRoot ;
++jaqtuq+1vv:SUPPRsaqtuq # ;
++jaqtuq+1vv:SUPPRsaqtuq VerbContinuations ;
++jaqtuq+1vv:SUPPRsaqtuq AfterApIRoot ;
++jaqtuq+1vv:SUPPRgiaqtuq # ;
++jaqtuq+1vv:SUPPRgiaqtuq VerbContinuations ;
++jaqtuq+1vv:SUPPRgiaqtuq AfterApIRoot ;
++jaqtuq+1vv:SUPPRriaqtuq # ;
++jaqtuq+1vv:SUPPRriaqtuq VerbContinuations ;
++jaqtuq+1vv:SUPPRriaqtuq AfterApIRoot ;
++jariiq+1vv:jariiq # ;
++jariiq+1vv:jariiq VerbContinuations ;
++jariiq+1vv:tariiq # ;
++jariiq+1vv:tariiq VerbContinuations ;
++jariiq+1vv:KGUARDtariiq # ;
++jariiq+1vv:KGUARDtariiq VerbContinuations ;
++jariiq+1vv:SUPPRgiiq # ;
++jariiq+1vv:SUPPRgiiq VerbContinuations ;
++jariiq+1vv:SUPPRriiq # ;
++jariiq+1vv:SUPPRriiq VerbContinuations ;
++jariuq+1vv:jariuq # ;
++jariuq+1vv:jariuq VerbContinuations ;
++jariuq+1vv:tariuq # ;
++jariuq+1vv:tariuq VerbContinuations ;
++jariuq+1vv:KGUARDtariuq # ;
++jariuq+1vv:KGUARDtariuq VerbContinuations ;
++jariuq+1vv:SUPPRgiuq # ;
++jariuq+1vv:SUPPRgiuq VerbContinuations ;
++jariuq+1vv:SUPPRriuq # ;
++jariuq+1vv:SUPPRriuq VerbContinuations ;
++juaq+2vv:VOICEjuaq # ;
++juaq+2vv:VOICEjuaq VerbContinuations ;
++juit+1vv:juit # ;
++juit+1vv:juit VerbContinuations ;
++juit+1vv:suit # ;
++juit+1vv:suit VerbContinuations ;
++juit+1vv:SUPPRjuit # ;
++juit+1vv:SUPPRjuit VerbContinuations ;
++juit+1vv:tuit # ;
++juit+1vv:tuit VerbContinuations ;
++juit+1vv:KGUARDtuit # ;
++juit+1vv:KGUARDtuit VerbContinuations ;
++juma+1vv:juma # ;
++juma+1vv:juma VerbContinuations ;
++juma+1vv:guma # ;
++juma+1vv:guma VerbContinuations ;
++juma+1vv:tuma # ;
++juma+1vv:tuma VerbContinuations ;
++juma+1vv:KGUARDtuma # ;
++juma+1vv:KGUARDtuma VerbContinuations ;
++juma+1vv:SUPPRguma # ;
++juma+1vv:SUPPRguma VerbContinuations ;
++juma+1vv:SUPPRruma # ;
++juma+1vv:SUPPRruma VerbContinuations ;
++jumaaq+1vv:jumaaq # ;
++jumaaq+1vv:jumaaq VerbContinuations ;
++jumaaq+1vv:gumaaq # ;
++jumaaq+1vv:gumaaq VerbContinuations ;
++jumaaq+1vv:tumaaq # ;
++jumaaq+1vv:tumaaq VerbContinuations ;
++jumaaq+1vv:KGUARDtumaaq # ;
++jumaaq+1vv:KGUARDtumaaq VerbContinuations ;
++jumaaq+1vv:SUPPRgumaaq # ;
++jumaaq+1vv:SUPPRgumaaq VerbContinuations ;
++jumaaq+1vv:SUPPRrumaaq # ;
++jumaaq+1vv:SUPPRrumaaq VerbContinuations ;
++juminaq+1vv:juminaq # ;
++juminaq+1vv:juminaq VerbContinuations ;
++juminaq+1vv:guminaq # ;
++juminaq+1vv:guminaq VerbContinuations ;
++juminaq+1vv:juminak # ;
++juminaq+1vv:juminak VerbContinuations ;
++juminaq+1vv:guminak # ;
++juminaq+1vv:guminak VerbContinuations ;
++juminaq+1vv:tuminaq # ;
++juminaq+1vv:tuminaq VerbContinuations ;
++juminaq+1vv:KGUARDtuminaq # ;
++juminaq+1vv:KGUARDtuminaq VerbContinuations ;
++juminaq+1vv:SUPPRguminaq # ;
++juminaq+1vv:SUPPRguminaq VerbContinuations ;
++juminaq+1vv:tuminak # ;
++juminaq+1vv:tuminak VerbContinuations ;
++juminaq+1vv:KGUARDtuminak # ;
++juminaq+1vv:KGUARDtuminak VerbContinuations ;
++juminaq+1vv:SUPPRguminak # ;
++juminaq+1vv:SUPPRguminak VerbContinuations ;
++juminaq+1vv:SUPPRruminaq # ;
++juminaq+1vv:SUPPRruminaq VerbContinuations ;
++juminaq+1vv:SUPPRruminak # ;
++juminaq+1vv:SUPPRruminak VerbContinuations ;
++junnanngit+1vv:junnanngit # ;
++junnanngit+1vv:junnanngit VerbContinuations ;
++junnanngit+1vv:junanngit # ;
++junnanngit+1vv:junanngit VerbContinuations ;
++junnanngit+1vv:gunnanngit # ;
++junnanngit+1vv:gunnanngit VerbContinuations ;
++junnanngit+1vv:gunanngit # ;
++junnanngit+1vv:gunanngit VerbContinuations ;
++junnanngit+1vv:tunnanngit # ;
++junnanngit+1vv:tunnanngit VerbContinuations ;
++junnanngit+1vv:KGUARDtunnanngit # ;
++junnanngit+1vv:KGUARDtunnanngit VerbContinuations ;
++junnanngit+1vv:tunanngit # ;
++junnanngit+1vv:tunanngit VerbContinuations ;
++junnanngit+1vv:KGUARDtunanngit # ;
++junnanngit+1vv:KGUARDtunanngit VerbContinuations ;
++junnanngit+1vv:SUPPRgunnanngit # ;
++junnanngit+1vv:SUPPRgunnanngit VerbContinuations ;
++junnanngit+1vv:SUPPRgunanngit # ;
++junnanngit+1vv:SUPPRgunanngit VerbContinuations ;
++junnanngit+1vv:SUPPRrunnanngit # ;
++junnanngit+1vv:SUPPRrunnanngit VerbContinuations ;
++junnanngit+1vv:SUPPRrunanngit # ;
++junnanngit+1vv:SUPPRrunanngit VerbContinuations ;
++junnaq+1vv:junnaq # ;
++junnaq+1vv:junnaq VerbContinuations ;
++junnaq+1vv:junaq # ;
++junnaq+1vv:junaq VerbContinuations ;
++junnaq+1vv:gunnaq # ;
++junnaq+1vv:gunnaq VerbContinuations ;
++junnaq+1vv:gunaq # ;
++junnaq+1vv:gunaq VerbContinuations ;
++junnaq+1vv:tunnaq # ;
++junnaq+1vv:tunnaq VerbContinuations ;
++junnaq+1vv:KGUARDtunnaq # ;
++junnaq+1vv:KGUARDtunnaq VerbContinuations ;
++junnaq+1vv:tunaq # ;
++junnaq+1vv:tunaq VerbContinuations ;
++junnaq+1vv:KGUARDtunaq # ;
++junnaq+1vv:KGUARDtunaq VerbContinuations ;
++junnaq+1vv:SUPPRgunnaq # ;
++junnaq+1vv:SUPPRgunnaq VerbContinuations ;
++junnaq+1vv:SUPPRgunaq # ;
++junnaq+1vv:SUPPRgunaq VerbContinuations ;
++junnaq+1vv:SUPPRrunnaq # ;
++junnaq+1vv:SUPPRrunnaq VerbContinuations ;
++junnaq+1vv:SUPPRrunaq # ;
++junnaq+1vv:SUPPRrunaq VerbContinuations ;
++junniiq+1vv:junniiq # ;
++junniiq+1vv:junniiq VerbContinuations ;
++junniiq+1vv:juniiq # ;
++junniiq+1vv:juniiq VerbContinuations ;
++junniiq+1vv:juniq # ;
++junniiq+1vv:juniq VerbContinuations ;
++junniiq+1vv:gunniiq # ;
++junniiq+1vv:gunniiq VerbContinuations ;
++junniiq+1vv:guniiq # ;
++junniiq+1vv:guniiq VerbContinuations ;
++junniiq+1vv:guniq # ;
++junniiq+1vv:guniq VerbContinuations ;
++junniiq+1vv:tunniiq # ;
++junniiq+1vv:tunniiq VerbContinuations ;
++junniiq+1vv:KGUARDtunniiq # ;
++junniiq+1vv:KGUARDtunniiq VerbContinuations ;
++junniiq+1vv:tuniiq # ;
++junniiq+1vv:tuniiq VerbContinuations ;
++junniiq+1vv:KGUARDtuniiq # ;
++junniiq+1vv:KGUARDtuniiq VerbContinuations ;
++junniiq+1vv:tuniq # ;
++junniiq+1vv:tuniq VerbContinuations ;
++junniiq+1vv:KGUARDtuniq # ;
++junniiq+1vv:KGUARDtuniq VerbContinuations ;
++junniiq+1vv:SUPPRgunniiq # ;
++junniiq+1vv:SUPPRgunniiq VerbContinuations ;
++junniiq+1vv:SUPPRguniiq # ;
++junniiq+1vv:SUPPRguniiq VerbContinuations ;
++junniiq+1vv:SUPPRguniq # ;
++junniiq+1vv:SUPPRguniq VerbContinuations ;
++junniiq+1vv:SUPPRrunniiq # ;
++junniiq+1vv:SUPPRrunniiq VerbContinuations ;
++junniiq+1vv:SUPPRruniiq # ;
++junniiq+1vv:SUPPRruniiq VerbContinuations ;
++junniiq+1vv:SUPPRruniq # ;
++junniiq+1vv:SUPPRruniq VerbContinuations ;
++juu+1vv:juu # ;
++juu+1vv:juu VerbContinuations ;
++juu+1vv:SUPPRjuu # ;
++juu+1vv:SUPPRjuu VerbContinuations ;
++juummi+1vv:jummi # ;
++juummi+1vv:jummi VerbContinuations ;
++juummi+1vv:jumi # ;
++juummi+1vv:jumi VerbContinuations ;
++juummi+1vv:VOICEjummi # ;
++juummi+1vv:VOICEjummi VerbContinuations ;
++juummi+1vv:VOICEjumi # ;
++juummi+1vv:VOICEjumi VerbContinuations ;
++kaallaq+1vv:kaallaq # ;
++kaallaq+1vv:kaallaq VerbContinuations ;
++kaallaq+1vv:kaallak # ;
++kaallaq+1vv:kaallak VerbContinuations ;
++kaallaq+1vv:SUPPRkaallaq # ;
++kaallaq+1vv:SUPPRkaallaq VerbContinuations ;
++kaallaq+1vv:SUPPRkaallak # ;
++kaallaq+1vv:SUPPRkaallak VerbContinuations ;
++kainnaq+1vv:kainnaq # ;
++kainnaq+1vv:kainnaq VerbContinuations ;
++kainnaq+1vv:SUPPRkainnaq # ;
++kainnaq+1vv:SUPPRkainnaq VerbContinuations ;
++kammiq+1vv:kammiq # ;
++kammiq+1vv:kammiq VerbContinuations ;
++kammiq+1vv:SUPPRkammiq # ;
++kammiq+1vv:SUPPRkammiq VerbContinuations ;
++kasak+1vv:kasak # ;
++kasak+1vv:kasak VerbContinuations ;
++kasak+1vv:kasaaq # ;
++kasak+1vv:kasaaq VerbContinuations ;
++kasak+1vv:kasaak # ;
++kasak+1vv:kasaak VerbContinuations ;
++kasak+1vv:SUPPRksak # ;
++kasak+1vv:SUPPRksak VerbContinuations ;
++kasak+1vv:SUPPRkasaaq # ;
++kasak+1vv:SUPPRkasaaq VerbContinuations ;
++kasak+1vv:SUPPRkasaak # ;
++kasak+1vv:SUPPRkasaak VerbContinuations ;
++kasak+1vv:SUPPRkasak # ;
++kasak+1vv:SUPPRkasak VerbContinuations ;
++kautigi+1vv:kautigi # ;
++kautigi+1vv:kautigi VerbContinuations ;
++kautigi+1vv:tsautigi # ;
++kautigi+1vv:tsautigi VerbContinuations ;
++kautigi+1vv:KGUARDtsautigi # ;
++kautigi+1vv:KGUARDtsautigi VerbContinuations ;
++kautigi+1vv:SUPPRkautigi # ;
++kautigi+1vv:SUPPRkautigi VerbContinuations ;
++kautigi+1vv:SUPPRtsautigi # ;
++kautigi+1vv:SUPPRtsautigi VerbContinuations ;
++kkanniq+1vv:kkanniq # ;
++kkanniq+1vv:kkanniq VerbContinuations ;
++kkanniq+1vv:kanniq # ;
++kkanniq+1vv:kanniq VerbContinuations ;
++kkanniq+1vv:SUPPRkkanniq # ;
++kkanniq+1vv:SUPPRkkanniq VerbContinuations ;
++kkanniq+1vv:SUPPRkanniq # ;
++kkanniq+1vv:SUPPRkanniq VerbContinuations ;
++kkaq+2vv:kkaq # ;
++kkaq+2vv:kkaq VerbContinuations ;
++kkaq+2vv:kkaq AfterApIRoot ;
++kkaq+2vv:SUPPRkkaq # ;
++kkaq+2vv:SUPPRkkaq VerbContinuations ;
++kkaq+2vv:SUPPRkkaq AfterApIRoot ;
++kutaaq+1vv:kutaaq # ;
++kutaaq+1vv:kutaaq VerbContinuations ;
++kutaaq+1vv:SUPPRkutaaq # ;
++kutaaq+1vv:SUPPRkutaaq VerbContinuations ;
++laaq+2vv:laaq # ;
++laaq+2vv:laaq VerbContinuations ;
++laaq+2vv:SUPPRlaaq # ;
++laaq+2vv:SUPPRlaaq VerbContinuations ;
++lak+1vv:lak # ;
++lak+1vv:lak VerbContinuations ;
++langa+1vv:langa # ;
++langa+1vv:langa VerbContinuations ;
++langa+1vv:SUPPRlanga # ;
++langa+1vv:SUPPRlanga VerbContinuations ;
++lataaq+2vv:lataaq # ;
++lataaq+2vv:lataaq VerbContinuations ;
++lataaq+2vv:SUPPRlataaq # ;
++lataaq+2vv:SUPPRlataaq VerbContinuations ;
++laukak+1vv:laukak # ;
++laukak+1vv:laukak VerbContinuations ;
++laukak+1vv:SUPPRlaukak # ;
++laukak+1vv:SUPPRlaukak VerbContinuations ;
++lauq+1vv:lauq # ;
++lauq+1vv:lauq VerbContinuations ;
++lauq+1vv:SUPPRlauq # ;
++lauq+1vv:SUPPRlauq VerbContinuations ;
++lauqsima+1vv:lauqsima # ;
